Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20252-416
Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Cash Fund is created and shall be administered by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment for purposes of the Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Act. The Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Cash Fund may consist of transfers as directed by the Legislature and gifts, grants, bequests, and money from any public or private source.

(2) The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment may apply for all grants from state, federal, and private sources that are applicable to the purposes of the Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Act.

(3) Any such grant applied for by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment that is awarded to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment or the State of Nebraska shall be credited to the Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Cash Fund.

(4) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2024, LB1368, § 6;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 10.
December 31, 2029
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.